test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/NA_VVW_ikwe_gt-glossing.yaml
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwenymishwaag
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+4: gdakwensmishnaanin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Loc: gdakwensmishnaaning
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Pl: gdakwensmishnaanig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: gdakwensmishwaan
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: gdakwensmishwaang
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Pl: gdakwensmishwaag
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: dakwenymishwaan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: dakwenymishwaang
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: dakwenymishniwan
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: dakwenymishniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+4: dakwensmishwaan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Loc: dakwensmishwaang
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+4: dakwensmishniwan
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Loc: dakwensmishniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ndakwenymishbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndakwenymishbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndakwenymishbaniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: ndakwensmishbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: ndakwensmishbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: ndakwensmishbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gdakwenymishbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdakwenymishbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdakwenymishbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: gdakwensmishbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: gdakwensmishbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: gdakwensmishbaniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: dakwenymishbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwenymishbaniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: dakwensmishbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwensmishbaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: dakwenymishbaniin
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwenymishbaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: dakwenymishbaniig
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+4: dakwensmishbaniin
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Loc: dakwensmishbaniing
     X+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+Prt+Pl: dakwensmishbaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwenyminaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwenyminaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwenyminaanbaniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwensminaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwensminaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwensminaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenyminaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenyminaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenyminaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenymiwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenymiwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenymiwaabniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwensminaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwensminaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwensminaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwensmiwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwensmiwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwensmiwaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwenymiwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwenymiwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: dakwenyminwibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwenyminwibniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwensmiwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwensmiwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+4: dakwensminwibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwensminwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwenyshinaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwenyshinaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwenyshinaanbaniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwensshinaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwensshinaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwensshinaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenyshinaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenyshinaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenyshinaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenyshiwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenyshiwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenyshiwaabniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwensshinaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwensshinaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwensshinaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwensshiwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwensshiwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwensshiwaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwenyshiwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwenyshiwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: dakwenyshinwibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwenyshinwibniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwensshiwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwensshiwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: dakwensshinwibniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwensshinwibniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwemshinaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwemshinaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwemshinaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwemshinaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwemshinaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwemshinaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwemshiwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwemshiwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwemshiwaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwemshiwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwemshiwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: dakwemshinwibniin
     3+kwe+NA+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwemshinwibniing
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwenymishnaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwenymishnaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwenymishnaanbaniig
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: ndakwensmishnaanbaniin
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: ndakwensmishnaanbaniing
     1+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: ndakwensmishnaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenymishnaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenymishnaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenymishnaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwenymishwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwenymishwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwenymishwaabniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwensmishnaanbaniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwensmishnaanbaniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+1+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwensmishnaanbaniig
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: gdakwensmishwaabniin
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: gdakwensmishwaabniing
     2+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Pl: gdakwensmishwaabniig
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwenymishwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwenymishwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: dakwenymishniwbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Con+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwenymishniwbaniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+4: dakwensmishwaabniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+2+Pl+Prt+Loc: dakwensmishwaabniing
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+4: dakwensmishniwbaniin
     3+kwe+NA+Dim+ThmPos+Pej+3+4+Prt+Loc: dakwensmishniwbaniing
     
